District of Columbia statutes.
11-905

Oath of judges.

Each judge of the Superior Court, when appointed shall take the oath prescribed for judges of courts of the United States.

History

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 482, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 111

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 11-905.
1973 Ed., § 11-905.